Rhode Island, session 2025, SB103.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 27-18-30 and 27-18-52 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18
entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance Policies" are hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-30. Health insurance contracts — Infertility.
(a) Any health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered or issued for delivery or
renewed in this state, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other
governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide coverage for
medically necessary expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages
of twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42) years, including preimplantation genetic diagnosis (PGD) in
conjunction with in vitro fertilization (IVF), and for standard fertility-preservation services when a
medically necessary medical treatment may directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic infertility to a
covered person. To the extent that a health insurance contract provides reimbursement for a test or
procedure used in the diagnosis or treatment of conditions other than infertility, the tests and
procedures shall not be excluded from reimbursement when provided attendant to the diagnosis
and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42)
years; provided, that a subscriber co-payment not to exceed twenty percent (20%) may be required
for those programs and/or procedures the sole purpose of which is the treatment of infertility.
(b) For purposes of this section, “infertility” means the condition of an otherwise
presumably healthy individual who is unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of
one year.

(c) For purposes of this section, “standard fertility-preservation services” means
procedures consistent with established medical practices and professional guidelines published by
the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or
other reputable professional medical organizations.
(d) For purposes of this section, “iatrogenic infertility” means an impairment of fertility by
surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or other medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or
processes.
(e) For purposes of this section, “may directly or indirectly cause” means treatment with a
likely side effect of infertility as established by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine,
the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional organizations.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 27-18-19 or any other provision to the contrary,
this section shall apply to blanket or group policies of insurance.
(g) The health insurance contract may limit coverage to a lifetime cap of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000).
(h) For purposes of this section, "preimplantation genetic diagnosis" or "PGD" means a
technique used in conjunction with in vitro fertilization (IVF) to test embryos for specific genetic
disorders prior to their transfer to the uterus.
27-18-52. Genetic testing.
(a) Except as provided in chapter 37.3 of title 5, insurance administrators, health plans and
providers shall be prohibited from releasing genetic information without prior written authorization
of the individual. Written authorization shall be required for each disclosure and include to whom
the disclosure is being made. An exception shall exist for those participating in research settings
governed by the Federal Policy for the Protection of Human Research Subjects (also known as
“The Common Rule”). Tests conducted purely for research are excluded from the definition, as are
tests for somatic (as opposed to heritable) mutations, and testing for forensic purposes.
(b) No individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state which provides health insurance medical coverage that includes
coverage for physician services in a physician’s office, and every policy which provides major
medical or similar comprehensive-type coverage excluding disability income, long term care and
insurance supplemental policies which only provide coverage for specified diseases or other
supplemental policies, shall:
(1) Use a genetic test or request for genetic tests or the results of a genetic test to reject,
deny, limit, cancel, refuse to renew, increase the rates of, affect the terms or conditions of, or affect
a group or an individual health insurance policy, contract, or plan;
LC000272 - Page 2 of 12

(2) Request or require a genetic test for the purpose of determining whether or not to issue
or renew an individual’s health benefits coverage, to set reimbursement/co-pay levels or determine
covered benefits and services;
(3) Release the results of a genetic test without the prior written authorization of the
individual from whom the test was obtained, except in a format whereby individual identifiers are
removed, encrypted, or encoded so that the identity of the individual is not disclosed. A recipient
of information pursuant to this section may use or disclose this information solely to carry out the
purpose for which the information was disclosed. Authorization shall be required for each
redisclosure; an exception shall exist for participating in research settings governed by the Federal
Policy for the Protection of Human Research Subjects (also known as “The Common Rule”).
(4) Request or require information as to whether an individual has ever had a genetic test,
or participated in genetic testing of any kind, whether for clinical or research purposes.
(c) For the purposes of this section, “genetic testing” is the analysis of an individual’s DNA,
RNA, chromosomes, proteins and certain metabolites in order to detect heritable disease-related
genotypes, mutations, phenotypes or karyotypes for clinical purposes. Those purposes include
predicting risk of disease, identifying carriers, establishing prenatal and clinical diagnosis or
prognosis. Prenatal, newborn and carrier screening, as well as testing in high risk families may be
included provided there is an approved release by a parent or guardian. Tests for metabolites are
covered only when they are undertaken with high probability that an excess of deficiency of the
metabolite indicates the presence of heritable mutations in single genes. “Genetic testing” does not
mean routine physical measurement, a routine chemical, blood, or urine analysis or a test for drugs
or for HIV infections.
(d) Any health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered or issued for delivery or
renewed in this state, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other
governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide coverage for the
expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five (25)
and forty-two (42) years, including preimplantation genetic diagnosis (PGD) in conjunction with
in vitro fertilization (IVF). For purposes of this section:
(1) "Preimplantation genetic diagnosis" or "PGD" means a technique used in conjunction
with in vitro fertilization (IVF) to test embryos for specific genetic disorders prior to their transfer
to the uterus;
(2) "Infertility" means the condition of an otherwise presumably healthy individual who is
unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of one year.

LC000272 - Page 3 of 12

SECTION 2. Sections 27-19-23 and 27-19-44 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19
entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service Corporations" are hereby amended to read as follows:
27-19-23. Coverage for infertility.
(a) Any nonprofit hospital service contract, plan, or insurance policies delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare
or other governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide coverage
for medically necessary expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the
ages of twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42) years, including preimplantation genetic diagnosis
(PGD) in conjunction with in vitro fertilization (IVF), and for standard fertility-preservation
services when a medically necessary medical treatment may directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic
infertility to a covered person. To the extent that a nonprofit hospital service corporation provides
reimbursement for a test or procedure used in the diagnosis or treatment of conditions other than
infertility, those tests and procedures shall not be excluded from reimbursement when provided
attendant to the diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five
(25) and forty-two (42) years; provided, that a subscriber copayment, not to exceed twenty percent
(20%), may be required for those programs and/or procedures the sole purpose of which is the
treatment of infertility.
(b) For purposes of this section, “infertility” means the condition of an otherwise
presumably healthy individual who is unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of
one year.
(c) For purposes of this section, “standard fertility-preservation services” means
procedures consistent with established medical practices and professional guidelines published by
the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or
other reputable professional medical organizations.
(d) For purposes of this section, “iatrogenic infertility” means an impairment of fertility by
surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or other medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or
processes.
(e) For purposes of this section, “may directly or indirectly cause” means treatment with a
likely side effect of infertility as established by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine,
the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional organizations.
(f) The health insurance contract may limit coverage to a lifetime cap of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000).
(g) For purposes of this section, "preimplantation genetic diagnosis" or "PGD" means a
technique used in conjunction with in vitro fertilization (IVF) to test embryos for specific genetic
LC000272 - Page 4 of 12

disorders prior to their transfer to the uterus.
27-19-44. Genetic testing.
(a) Except as provided in chapter 37.3 of title 5, insurance administrators, health plans, and
providers shall be prohibited from releasing genetic information without prior written authorization
of the individual. Written authorization shall be required for each disclosure and include to whom
the disclosure is being made. An exception shall exist for those participating in research settings
governed by the federal policy for the protection of human research subjects (also known as “The
Common Rule”). Tests conducted purely for research are excluded from the definition, as are tests
for somatic (as opposed to heritable) mutations, and testing for forensic purposes.
(b) No nonprofit health service corporation subject to the provisions of this chapter shall:
(1) Use a genetic test or request for a genetic test or the results of a genetic test or other
genetic information to reject, deny, limit, cancel, refuse to renew, increase the rates of, affect the
terms or conditions of, or affect a group or an individual’s health insurance policy, contract, or
plan;
(2) Request or require a genetic test for the purpose of determining whether or not to issue
or renew a group, individual health benefits coverage, to set reimbursement/copay levels, or
determine covered benefits and services;
(3) Release the results of a genetic test without the prior written authorization of the
individual from whom the test was obtained, except in a format by which individual identifiers are
removed, encrypted, or encoded so that the identity of the individual is not disclosed. A recipient
of information pursuant to this section may use or disclose the information solely to carry out the
purpose for which the information was disclosed. Authorization shall be required for each
redisclosure. An exception shall exist for participation in research settings governed by the federal
policy for the protection of human research subjects (also known as “The Common Rule”); or
(4) Request or require information as to whether an individual has ever had a genetic test,
or participated in genetic testing of any kind, whether for clinical or research purposes.
(c) For the purposes of this section, “genetic testing” is the analysis of an individual’s DNA,
RNA, chromosomes, proteins, and certain metabolites in order to detect heritable disease-related
genotypes, mutations, phenotypes, or karyotypes for clinical purposes. These purposes include
predicting risk of disease, identifying carriers, establishing prenatal and clinical diagnosis or
prognosis. Prenatal, newborn, and carrier screening, as well as testing in high-risk families, may be
included provided there is an approved release by a parent or guardian. Tests for metabolites are
covered only when they are undertaken with high probability that an excess of deficiency of the
metabolite indicates the presence of heritable mutations in single genes. “Genetic testing” does not
LC000272 - Page 5 of 12

mean routine physical measurement, a routine chemical, blood, or urine analysis, or a test for drugs
or for HIV infection.
(d) Any health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered or issued for delivery or
renewed in this state, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other
governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide coverage for the
expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five (25)
and forty-two (42) years, including preimplantation genetic diagnosis (PGD) in conjunction with
in vitro fertilization (IVF). For purposes of this section:
(1) "Preimplantation genetic diagnosis" or "PGD" means a technique used in conjunction
with in vitro fertilization (IVF) to test embryos for specific genetic disorders prior to their transfer
to the uterus;
(2) "Infertility" means the condition of an otherwise presumably healthy individual who is
unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of one year.
SECTION 3. Sections 27-20-20 and 27-20-39 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20
entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service Corporations" are hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20-20. Coverage for infertility.
(a) Any nonprofit medical service contract, plan, or insurance policies delivered, issued for
delivery, or renewed in this state, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare
or other governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide coverage
for the medically necessary expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between
the ages of twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42) years, including preimplantation genetic diagnosis
(PGD) in conjunction with in vitro fertilization (IVF), and for standard fertility-preservation
services when a medically necessary medical treatment may directly or indirectly cause iatrogenic
infertility to a covered person. To the extent that a nonprofit medical service corporation provides
reimbursement for a test or procedure used in the diagnosis or treatment of conditions other than
infertility, those tests and procedures shall not be excluded from reimbursement when provided
attendant to the diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five
(25) and forty-two (42) years; provided, that subscriber copayment, not to exceed twenty percent
(20%), may be required for those programs and/or procedures the sole purpose of which is the
treatment of infertility.
(b) For purposes of this section, “infertility” means the condition of an otherwise
presumably healthy individual who is unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of
one year.
(c) For purposes of this section, “standard fertility-preservation services” means
LC000272 - Page 6 of 12

procedures consistent with established medical practices and professional guidelines published by
the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or
other reputable professional medical organizations.
(d) For purposes of this section, “iatrogenic infertility” means an impairment of fertility by
surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or other medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or
processes.
(e) For purposes of this section, “may directly or indirectly cause” means treatment with a
likely side effect of infertility as established by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine,
the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional organizations.
(f) The health insurance contract may limit coverage to a lifetime cap of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000).
(g) For purposes of this section, "preimplantation genetic diagnosis" or "PGD" means a
technique used in conjunction with in vitro fertilization (IVF) to test embryos for specific genetic
disorders prior to their transfer to the uterus.
27-20-39. Genetic testing.
(a) Except as provided in chapter 37.3 of title 5, insurance administrators, health plans, and
providers shall be prohibited from releasing genetic information without prior written authorization
of the individual. Written authorization shall be required for each disclosure and include to whom
the disclosure is being made. An exception shall exist for those participating in research settings
governed by the federal policy for the protection of human research subjects (also known as “The
Common Rule”). Tests conducted purely for research are excluded from the definition, as are tests
for somatic (as opposed to heritable) mutations, and testing for forensic purposes.
(b) No nonprofit health insurer subject to the provisions of this chapter shall:
(1) Use a genetic test or request for a genetic test or the results of a genetic test to reject,
deny, limit, cancel, refuse to renew, increase the rates of, affect the terms or conditions of, or affect
a group or individual’s health insurance policy, contract, or plan;
(2) Request or require a genetic test for the purpose of determining whether or not to issue
or renew health benefits coverage, to set reimbursement/copay levels, or determine covered
benefits and services;
(3) Release the results of a genetic test without the prior written authorization of the
individual from whom the test was obtained, except in a format by which individual identifiers are
removed, encrypted, or encoded so that the identity of the individual is not disclosed. A recipient
of information pursuant to this section may use or disclose the information solely to carry out the
purpose for which the information was disclosed. Authorization shall be required for each
LC000272 - Page 7 of 12

redisclosure. An exception shall exist for participation in research settings governed by the federal
policy for the protection of human research subjects (also known as “The Common Rule”); or
(4) Request or require information as to whether an individual has ever had a genetic test,
or participated in genetic testing of any kind, whether for clinical or research purposes.
(c) For the purposes of this section, “genetic testing” is the analysis of an individual’s DNA,
RNA, chromosomes, proteins, and certain metabolites in order to detect heritable disease-related
genotypes, mutations, phenotypes, or karyotypes for clinical purposes. Those purposes include
predicting risk of disease, identifying carriers, establishing prenatal and clinical diagnosis or
prognosis. Prenatal, newborn, and carrier screening, as well as testing in high-risk families, may be
included provided there is an approved release by a parent or guardian. Tests for metabolites are
covered only when they are undertaken with high probability that an excess of deficiency of the
metabolite indicates the presence of heritable mutations in single genes. “Genetic testing” does not
mean routine physical measurement, a routine chemical, blood, or urine analysis, or a test for drugs
or for HIV infections.
(d) Any health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered or issued for delivery or
renewed in this state, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other
governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide coverage for the
expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five (25)
and forty-two (42) years, including preimplantation genetic diagnosis (PGD) in conjunction with
in vitro fertilization (IVF). For purposes of this section:
(1) "Preimplantation genetic diagnosis" or "PGD" means a technique used in conjunction
with in vitro fertilization (IVF) to test embryos for specific genetic disorders prior to their transfer
to the uterus;
(2) "Infertility" means the condition of an otherwise presumably healthy individual who is
unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of one year.
SECTION 4. Sections 27-41-33 and 27-41-53 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41
entitled "Health Maintenance Organizations" are hereby amended to read as follows:
27-41-33. Coverage for infertility.
(a) Any health maintenance organization service contract plan or policy delivered, issued
for delivery, or renewed in this state, except a contract providing supplemental coverage to
Medicare or other governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide
coverage for medically necessary expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women
between the ages of twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42) years, including preimplantation genetic
diagnosis (PGD) in conjunction with in vitro fertilization (IVF), and for standard fertility-
LC000272 - Page 8 of 12

preservation services when a medically necessary medical treatment may directly or indirectly
cause iatrogenic infertility to a covered person. To the extent that a health maintenance organization
provides reimbursement for a test or procedure used in the diagnosis or treatment of conditions
other than infertility, those tests and procedures shall not be excluded from reimbursement when
provided attendant to the diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of
twenty-five (25) and forty-two (42) years; provided, that subscriber copayment, not to exceed
twenty percent (20%), may be required for those programs and/or procedures the sole purpose of
which is the treatment of infertility.
(b) For purposes of this section, “infertility” means the condition of an otherwise healthy
individual who is unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of one year.
(c) For purposes of this section, “standard fertility-preservation services” means
procedures consistent with established medical practices and professional guidelines published by
the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or
other reputable professional medical organizations.
(d) For purposes of this section, “iatrogenic infertility” means an impairment of fertility by
surgery, radiation, chemotherapy, or other medical treatment affecting reproductive organs or
processes.
(e) For purposes of this section, “may directly or indirectly cause” means treatment with a
likely side effect of infertility as established by the American Society for Reproductive Medicine,
the American Society of Clinical Oncology, or other reputable professional organizations.
(f) The health insurance contract may limit coverage to a lifetime cap of one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000).
(g) For purposes of this section, "preimplantation genetic diagnosis" or "PGD" means a
technique used in conjunction with in vitro fertilization (IVF) to test embryos for specific genetic
disorders prior to their transfer to the uterus.
27-41-53. Genetic testing.
(a) Except as provided in chapter 37.3 of title 5, insurance administrators, health plans, and
providers shall be prohibited from releasing genetic information without prior written authorization
of the individual. Written authorization shall be required for each disclosure and include to whom
the disclosure is being made. An exception shall exist for those participating in research settings
governed by the federal policy for the protection of human research subjects (also known as “The
Common Rule”). Tests conducted purely for research are excluded from the definition, as are tests
for somatic (as opposed to heritable) mutations, and testing for forensic purposes.
(b) No health maintenance organization subject to the provisions of this chapter shall:
LC000272 - Page 9 of 12

(1) Use a genetic test or request for genetic test or the results of a genetic test to reject,
deny, limit, cancel, refuse to renew, increase the rates of, affect the terms or conditions of, or affect
a group or an individual’s health insurance policy contract, or plan;
(2) Request or require a genetic test for the purpose of determining whether or not to issue
or renew an individual’s health benefits coverage, to set reimbursement/copay levels, or determine
covered benefits and services;
(3) Release the results of a genetic test without the prior written authorization of the
individual from whom the test was obtained, except in a format where individual identifiers are
removed, encrypted, or encoded so that the identity of the individual is not disclosed. A recipient
of information pursuant to this section may use or disclose the information solely to carry out the
purpose for which the information was disclosed. Authorization shall be required for each re-
disclosure. An exception shall exist for participation in research settings governed by the federal
policy for the protection of human research subjects (also known as “The Common Rule”); or
(4) Request or require information as to whether an individual has ever had a genetic test,
or participated in genetic testing of any kind, whether for clinical or research purposes.
(c) For the purposes of this section, “genetic testing” is the analysis of an individual’s DNA,
RNA, chromosomes, protein, and certain metabolites in order to detect heritable inheritable
disease-related genotypes, mutations, phenotypes, or karyotypes for clinical purposes. Those
purposes include predicting risk of disease, identifying carriers, establishing prenatal and clinical
diagnosis or prognosis. Prenatal, newborn, and carrier screening, and testing in high-risk families
may be included provided there is an approved release by a parent or guardian. Tests for metabolites
are covered only when they are undertaken with high probability that an excess or deficiency of the
metabolite indicates the presence of heritable mutations in single genes. “Genetic testing” does not
mean routine physical measurement, a routine chemical, blood, or urine analysis or a test for drugs
or for HIV infections.
(d) Any health insurance contract, plan, or policy delivered or issued for delivery or
renewed in this state, except contracts providing supplemental coverage to Medicare or other
governmental programs, that includes pregnancy-related benefits, shall provide coverage for the
expenses of diagnosis and treatment of infertility for women between the ages of twenty-five (25)
and forty-two (42) years, including preimplantation genetic diagnosis (PGD) in conjunction with
in vitro fertilization (IVF). For purposes of this section:
(1) "Preimplantation genetic diagnosis" or "PGD" means a technique used in conjunction
with in vitro fertilization (IVF) to test embryos for specific genetic disorders prior to their transfer
to the uterus;
LC000272 - Page 10 of 12

(2) "Infertility" means the condition of an otherwise presumably healthy individual who is
unable to conceive or sustain a pregnancy during a period of one year.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC000272
========
LC000272 - Page 11 of 12